Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-263
County agricultural society; neglect of duties; cease to exist; effect.

In all cases when county agricultural societies neglect for two years to hold a county fair or cease to exist, in any county where payments have been made for real estate or improvements upon such real estate for the use of a county agricultural society, then all such real estate and improvements shall vest in fee simple in the county, and the district court of the county, upon proof thereof, shall, upon petition of the county board, make a proper decree vesting the title of such property in the county.

Laws 1879, § 15, p. 401;

Laws 1905, c. 1, § 1, p. 51;

R.S.1913, § 11;

C.S.1922, § 11;

C.S.1929, § 2-206;

Laws 1931, c. 2, § 1, p. 58;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 2-206;

R.S.1943, § 2-209;

R.S.1943, (1991), § 2-209;

Laws 1997, LB 469, § 14.

Upon dissolution of society under this section, only the real estate purchased and improvements made by money paid out of county treasury vest in the county. Owen v. Main, 92 Neb. 258, 138 N.W. 154 (1912).